Utah, session 2026, SB37.
Section 1. Section 72-4-224 is enacted to read:72-4-224. George E. Wahlen Memorial Highway.(1)There is established the George E. Wahlen Memorial Highway composed of the portion of existing Route 126 contained within Weber County.(2)In addition to other official designations, the Department of Transportation shall designate the portion of the highway identified in Subsection (1) as the George E. Wahlen Memorial Highway on future state highway maps.(3)As soon as practicable, the Department of Transportation shall install appropriate signs along portions of the highway indicating the designation as the George E. Wahlen Memorial Highway as described in Subsection (1).

Section 2:
Section 2.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.